Washington statutes.
RCW 35.63.100

Restrictions—Recommendations of commission—Hearings—Adoption of comprehensive plan—Certifying—Filing or recording.

The commission may recommend to its council or board the plan prepared by it as a whole, or may recommend parts of the plan by successive recommendations; the parts corresponding with geographic or political sections, division or subdivisions of the municipality, or with functional subdivisions of the subject matter of the plan, or in the case of counties, with suburban settlement or arterial highway area. It may also prepare and recommend any amendment or extension thereof or addition thereto.

Before the recommendation of the initial plan to the municipality the commission shall hold at least one public hearing thereon, giving notice of the time and place by one publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality and in the official gazette, if any, of the municipality.

The council may adopt by resolution or ordinance and the board may adopt by resolution the plan recommended to it by the commission, or any part of the plan, as the comprehensive plan.

A true copy of the resolution of the board adopting or embodying such plan or any part thereof or any amendment thereto shall be certified by the clerk of the board and filed with the county auditor. A like certified copy of any map or plat referred to or adopted by the county resolution shall likewise be filed with the county auditor. The auditor shall record the resolution and keep on file the map or plat.

The original resolution or ordinance of the council adopting or embodying such plan or any part thereof or any amendment thereto shall be certified by the clerk of the city and filed by him or her. The original of any map or plat referred to or adopted by the resolution or ordinance of the council shall likewise be certified by the clerk of the city and filed by him or her. The clerk shall keep on file the resolution or ordinance and map or plat.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2116; 1967 ex.s. c 144 s 8; 1965 c 7 s 35.63.100. Prior: 1935 c 44 s 8; RRS s 9322-8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1967 ex.s. c 144: The effective date of 1967 ex.s. c 144 is July 30, 1967.

Severability—1967 ex.s. c 144: See note following RCW 36.900.030.

Validation—1967 ex.s. c 144: "Any city comprehensive plan and all amendments thereto which have been filed or recorded with the county auditor prior to the effective date of this 1967 amendatory act shall be valid and need not be refiled with the clerk of the city to remain valid and in full force and effect." [ 1967 ex.s. c 144 s 10.]